Utah statutes.
9-6-402.   Purpose.
This part is designed to:
(1)  establish a program which administers that portion of appropriations for
capital expenditures which is set aside for the acquisition of works of art
used for public buildings;
(2)  enhance the quality of life in the state by placing art of the highest
quality in public spaces where it is seen by the general public;
(3)  promote and preserve appreciation for and exposure to the arts; and
(4)  foster cultural development in the state and encourage the creativity and
talents of its artists and craftspeople.
